New York, session 2025-2026, S5577.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 1 of subsection (b) of section 6805 of the insur- 2 ance law, as added by chapter 181 of the laws of 2012, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (1) only deposit money as bail in the amount of two thousand dollars 5 or less for a defendant charged with one or more misdemeanors committed 6 during a single occurrence or transaction, and who has never previously 7 been charged with a crime, provided, however, that such organization 8 shall not execute as surety any bond for any defendant; 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09654-01-5